Vermont, session 2025-2026, H256.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 1011 is amended to read:
§ 1011. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(8) “Employee,” “Employee” means any individual employed and
compensated on a permanent or limited status basis by the Judiciary
Department, including permanent part-time employees and any individual
whose employment has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any
current labor dispute or because of an unfair labor practice. “Employee” does
not include any of the following:
VT LEG #380565 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.256
2025 Page 2 of 2
(A) a Justice, judge, assistant judge, magistrate, or hearing officer;
(B) the Court Administrator;
(C) a managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee;
(D) a law clerk, attorney, or administrative assistant or private
secretary to a judge, Justice, or Court Administrator;
(E) an individual employed on a temporary, contractual, seasonal, or
on-call basis, including an intern;
(F) an employee during the initial or extended probationary period;
(G) the head of a department or division;
(H) [Repealed.]
(I) an attorney for the Supreme Court, for the Court Administrator, or
for any board or commission created by the Supreme Court;
(J) an employee paid by the State who is appointed part-time as
county clerk pursuant to 4 V.S.A. § 651 or 691; or
(K) an employee who, after hearing by the Board upon petition of
any individual, the employer, or a collective bargaining unit, is determined to
be in a position that is sufficiently inconsistent with the spirit and intent of this
chapter to warrant exclusion.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380565 v.1